Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-514.01
Health care providers; legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds that health care providers are at risk of significant exposure to the blood and other body fluids of patients as a result of their work. The testing of such body fluids for the presence of infectious disease is necessary to provide postexposure risk-reduction methods and treatment, if necessary, for health care providers when there is a significant exposure to the body fluid of a patient and there are unresolved issues of consent by the patient to the testing of such fluids.

Laws 1994, LB 819, § 7.